src/fst/morphology/ext-TRmorph/morph.lexc
LEXICON EndQuote
%'^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV           EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV^sVC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFUV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sFRV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBUV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%'%'^sBRV^sUC       EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%"^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%’^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV             EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV^sVC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sFRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBUV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;
%”^sBRV^sUC         EndQuoteCont;

LEXICON EndQuoteCont
                 N;
!%<N%>:@RB       Nderiv;    ! these are useful in case we want this to 
!%<N%>:@RB       Ninfl;     ! apply only if there are inflections.
#endif

!
! Rules governing nouns, including proper names and compounding
!


LEXICON NPcomp  ! this is only for lexicalized forms with compounding
@NCOMP%<N%:prop%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB NPcont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
@NCOMP%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MREDUP@RB NPcont;
#endif

LEXICON NPPart
%<N%:prop%:partial%>:@RB   NPcont;

LEXICON NP
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPcont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPcont;
#endif

LEXICON NP_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<N%:prop%:typo%>:@RB   NPcont;
%<N%:prop%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPcont;
#else
                        NP;
#endif

LEXICON NP_abbr
%<N%:prop%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB   NPAbbrCont;

LEXICON NPAbbrCont
                ENDLEX;
                NPApos;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_ABBR == 1)
                NPAposCont;
#endif

LEXICON NPcont
                ENDLEX;
                NPApos;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_PN == 1) 
                NPAposCont;
#endif


LEXICON NPApos  
0:@APOS@MB     NPAposCont;

LEXICON   NPAposCont  
                Nderiv;
                Ninfl;

LEXICON NPnation
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPnationCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPnationCont;
#endif

LEXICON NPnationCont
                NPcont;
                ND_CAlanguage;

LEXICON NPperson
%<N%:prop%>:@RB   NPpersonCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<N%:prop%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NPpersonCont;
#endif

LEXICON NPpersonCont
                NPcont;
0:@APOS@MB      D_gil;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_PN == 1) 
                D_gil;
#endif



LEXICON Ncomp ! this is only for lexicalized forms with compounding
@NCOMP%<N%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB NcompCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
@NCOMP%<N%:mredup%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MREDUP@RB NcompCont;
#endif

LEXICON NcompInfl  ! this is for regular nouns
%<ncomp%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@MB    NcompCont;


LEXICON NcompCont
#if (NOUN_APOSTROPHE == 1)
0:@APOS@MB  NcompAposCont;
#endif
            ENDLEX;
            NcompAposCont;

LEXICON NcompAposCont
                Nderiv;
                Ninfl;

LEXICON Ninfl
                Nplu;
                Npos;
                Ncase;
                NomPredicate;

!
! Nouns representing family members can get plural after p1s/p2s
!
! teyze-m-ler, dayın-n-lar ..
! -lAr here works like a derivational morpheme that derives another
! (plural) noun. However, it is at best odd to have another possessive
! suffix, so, we do not allow another possessive suffix after -lAr.
!
! These may also be treated as a proper noun in combination with the
! person's name, needing an apostrophe after the possessive suffix.
! E.g., "Ahmet Amcam'ın"

LEXICON Nfamily
%<N%>:@RB   Ncont;
%<N%>:@RB   NfamCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<N%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    Ncont;
%<N%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    NfamCont;
#endif

LEXICON NfamCont
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB@APOS@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB@APOS@MB      NfamPosCont;
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB@APOS@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB@APOS@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB@APOS@MB     NposCont;

LEXICON NfamPosCont
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NposCont;
! %<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NpluCont; ! use this instead  of the above line
                           ! to accept forms like dayı-n-lar-ım

!
! Noun abbreviations
!

LEXICON N_unit  ! we may treat these differntly later
%<N%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB       NAbbrCont;

LEXICON N_abbr  
%<N%:abbr%>:@ABBR@RB       NAbbrCont;

LEXICON NAbbrCont
                        ENDLEX;
0:@APOS@MB              Ncont;
#if (APOSTROPHE_OPTIONAL_ABBR == 1) 
                        Ncont;
#endif

!
! End of family nouns + possessive-plural 
!

LEXICON N
%<N%>:@RB       Ncont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<N%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    Ncont;
#endif

LEXICON N_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<N%:typo%>:@RB     Ncont;
#else
                    N;
#endif

LEXICON NPart
%<N%:partial%>:@RB   ENDLEX;

LEXICON NPartLast
%<N%:partial%>:@RB   Ncont;

LEXICON Ncont
    Nderiv;
    NcompCont; ! includes final
#if (MARK_NCOMP == 1) 
    NcompInfl;
#endif

LEXICON Ntime
%<N%>:@RB    NtimeCont;

LEXICON NtimeCont
                    Ki;
                    D_dir;
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      D_dir;
                    Ncont;
                    D_lArI;
                    D_lIGInA;

LEXICON Nplu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB NpluCont;

LEXICON NpluCont
   ENDLEX;
   Npos;
   Ncase;
   NomPredicatePLU;
   ND_CA;
   D_arasi;

LEXICON Npos
%<p1s%>:^(I)m@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>:^(I)n@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB     Npos3sCont;
%<p1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p3p%>:l^Ar^I@MB     NposCont;

LEXICON Npos3sCont
        NposCont;
#if (MARK_NCOMP == 0 && NOUN_APOSTROPHE == 1) 
0:@APOS@MB  NposCont;
#endif


LEXICON  NposCont
    ENDLEX;
    Ncase;
    NomPredicate;
    D_gil; ! TODO: this should be restricted
    ND_CA;

LEXICON  NCaseNoGen
! %<nom%>:^(y)^I@MB   NomCaseCont; ! we do not (yet) mark for nominative
%<acc%>:^(y)^I@MB   AccCaseCont;
%<dat%>:^(y)^A@MB   Case1Cont;
%<abl%>:^D^An@MB    Case1Cont;
%<ins%>:^(y)l^NS^A@MB  Case1Cont;
%<loc%>:^D^A@MB     LocCaseCont;

LEXICON  Ncase
                    D_sIz; ! sIz can combine after most of the inflectional suffixes
                    NCaseNoGen;                    
%<gen%>:^(n)^In@MB  GenCaseCont;

LEXICON Case1Cont
            ENDLEX;
            NomPredicate;

!
! Normally, predicative use after accusative is almost an
! impossibility, but some forms exist: `renginiyse Ali seçmiş', 
!
LEXICON AccCaseCont
             Case1Cont;
!            ENDLEX;

LEXICON LocCaseCont
            ENDLEX;
            Ki;
            NomPredicate;

LEXICON GenCaseCont
            ENDLEX;
            Ki;
            NomPredicate;

LEXICON Ki
%<ki%>:ki@MB DerivJCont;

!
! This part deals with person agreement
!

LEXICON NomPredicatePLU
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredPagr;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredPagr3s;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 NomPredDir;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 CplAll;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                 ENDLEX;
#else
                                NomPredPagr;
                                NomPredPagr3s;
                                NomPredDir;
                                CplAll;
                                ENDLEX;
#endif
                                       NomPredQ;
                                      CliticSA;

LEXICON NomPredicate
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                       NomPredPagr3p;
#else
                                      NomPredPagr3p;
#endif
                                      NomPredicatePLU;

LEXICON NomPredicateMAK
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredPagr3s;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredPagr3p;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        NomPredDir;
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                        CplAll;
#else
                                       NomPredPagr3s;
                                       NomPredPagr3p;
                                       NomPredDir;
                                       CplAll;
#endif
                                       NomPredQ;

LEXICON NomPredQ
#if (ZERO_DERIV == 1)
%<%0%>%<V%>:@MB                         NomPredQCont;
#else
                                        NomPredQCont;
#endif

LEXICON NomPredQCont
#if (PREDICATE_WITHOUT_PAGR == 1)
%<cpl%:pres%>:@MB                         ENDLEX;
#endif
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        NomPredPagr;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        NomPredDir;
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB                        CplAll;

LEXICON NomPredPagr
%<cpl%:pres%>%<1s%>:^(y)^NS^Im@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<2s%>:s^NS^In@MB          NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<1p%>:^(y)^NS^Iz@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
%<cpl%:pres%>%<2p%>:s^NS^In^Iz@MB       NomPredPagrCont;
                                        NomPredPagr3s;

LEXICON NomPredPagr3s
#if (ZERO_COPULA == 1)
%<cpl%:pres%>%<3s%>:0@MB             NomPredPagrCont;
#else
                    ENDLEX;
                    CVcesine;
                    DIrEnd;
#endif

LEXICON NomPredPagrCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    CVcesine;
                    DIrEnd;


LEXICON  NomPredPagr3p
%<cpl%:pres%>%<3p%>:l^NS^Ar@MB         NomPredPagr3pCont;
%<3p%>:l^NS^Ar@MB                      PAgrCplAll;

LEXICON NomPredPagr3pCont
                        NomPredPagrCont;        ! includes end state
%<q%>:@miSPCm^I@MB      NomPred3pQCont;

LEXICON  NomPred3pQCont
                        NomPredPagrCont;        ! includes end state
                        PAgrCplAll;

LEXICON NomPredDir
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB  NomPredDirCont;

LEXICON NomPredDirCont
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB    ENDLEX;

LEXICON DIrEnd
%<dir%>:^D^NS^Ir@MB  ENDLEX;

!
! Rules governing adjectives and adverbs
!
!
! TODO: proper handling of derivations
!           . adj -> adv zero derivation
!           . -ca -casi etc.

LEXICON Adj
%<Adj%>:@RB        AdjCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adj%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdjCont;
#endif

LEXICON Adj_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<Adj%:typo%>:@RB     AdjCont;
%<Adj%:type%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdjCont;
#else
                    Adj;
#endif

LEXICON AdjPartLast
%<Adj%:partial%>:@RB        AdjCont;

LEXICON AdjPart
%<Adj%:partial%>:@RB        ENDLEX;

LEXICON AdjNcomp
@NCOMP%<Adj%>:^(s)^I@NCOMP@RB AdjCont;

LEXICON  AdjCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    NomPredicate;
                    Jderiv;

LEXICON AdvHep
                    HepPrn;
                    Adv;

LEXICON Adv
%<Adv%>:@RB         AdvCont;
#if (ALLOW_MREDUP == 1)
%<Adv%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdvCont;
#endif


LEXICON Adv_typo
#if (MARK_TYPOS == 1) 
%<Adv%:typo%>:@RB     AdjCont;
%<Adv%:mredup%:typo%>:@MREDUP@RB    AdvCont;
#else
                    Adv;
#endif

LEXICON AdvPartLast
%<Adv%:partial%>:@RB        AdvCont;
